Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2186
Sale of property; report of referee.

After completing said sale, the referee or referees must report their proceedings to the court, with a description of the different parcels of land sold to each purchaser, and the price bid therefor, which report shall be filed with the clerk.

R.S.1867, Code § 818, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8301;

C.S.1922, § 9254;

C.S.1929, § 20-2186;

R.S.1943, § 25-2186.

Sale may be made prior to report. Schick v. Whitcomb, 68 Neb. 784, 94 N.W. 1023 (1903).